src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BASSTEL !!= @CODE@  Attr ening on -is. Without CG. Adjs on -et, -l, -r, sm om -k, -sj with attr -is and no consonant gradation. As b. in Spiik. Sg Acc: basstelav, Attr: basstelis. Many of these entries might be instances of derivations, like belak, deblak, and maybe also basstel, bargán.
                   :is%>   ATTR           ;
                   :       VUOHTA         ;
                   :%>     N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>     OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>     ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it   K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:%>     R              ;
                   :%>     ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: goavrret # Odd-syllable test
!!€ goavrret:              goavrret+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goavrredav:            goavrret+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ goavrredis:            goavrret+A+Attr
!!€ goavrredabbo:          goavrret+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 

LEXICON MUTTÁK !!= @CODE@ Two attr enings -is and same as pred. Without CG. Adjs on -ák/-ak/-ek, two attr: -is and same as pred. As c. in Spiik. Sg Acc: muttágav, Attr: muttágis and mutták. These seem to be instances of the adjectival -k derivation. Unclear whether such derivation have different attr forms or not, and thats maybe why some of these derivations are found in BASSTEL lexicon.
                   :%>   ATTR           ;
            +Use/NG:is%> ATTR           ;
                   :%>   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:%>   R              ;
                   :%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: bárvak # Odd-syllable test
!!€ bárvak:               bárvak+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ bárvagav:             bárvak+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ bárvak:               bárvak+A+Attr
!!€ bárvagis:             bárvak+A+Attr
!!€ bárvagabbo:           bárvak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON JALGGAT !!= @CODE@ Attr III -is, not jalggadis but JALGGIS. Without CG.  Adjectives on -at, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: jalggadav, attr: jalggis,
                   :%>is   ATTR           ;
                   :%>at   VUOHTA         ;
                   :%>at   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>ad   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>ad   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>adit K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:%>at   R              ;
                   :%>ad   ODDCmp         ;


!!€gt-norm: russjkat # Odd-syllable test
!!€ russjkat:               russjkat+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ russjkadav:             russjkat+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ russjkis:               russjkat+A+Attr
!!€ russjkadabbo:           russjkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON TJÅRGGÅT !!= @CODE@ Attr III -is, not tjårggådis but tjårggis. Without CG. Same as JALGGAT only for adjectives ending ot -åt. Adjectives on -åt, with attribute III -is. As f. in Spiik. Sg Acc: jalggadav, attr: jalggis,
                   :%>is ATTR           ;
                   :%>åt   VUOHTA         ;
                   :%>åt   N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :%>åd   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>åd   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>ådit K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:%>åt   R              ;
                   :%>åd   ODDCmp         ;


!!€gt-norm: russjkat # Odd-syllable test
!!€ russjkat:               russjkat+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ russjkadav:             russjkat+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ russjkis:               russjkat+A+Attr
!!€ russjkadabbo:           russjkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



LEXICON RIHTSOK !!= @CODE@ No attr, without CG and also without any vowelchanges. The lexicon gives no attribute, either because the adjective dosnºt have attr, because there is stemvowel change in attr that the lexicon canºt handle or because there are strange atrributes that donºt fit to any other lexicon (these attributes are hardcoded). Sg Acc: rihtsogav. 
                   :%>   VUOHTA           ;
                   :%>   N-ODDCASE        ;
                   :%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>it K-CONS         ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                ;
                   :%>   ODDCmp         ;

!!€gt-norm: rihtsok # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rihtsok:                rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ rihtsogav:              rihtsok+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rihtsogabbo:            rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 



!---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! exception lexicons for odd-syll

LEXICON IENNILS !!= @CODE@ no comparatives, attr same as pred.
 :%> ATTR           ;
 :   VUOHTA         ;
 :%> N-ODDCASE      ;
 :%> OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
 :   NAMÁK          ;
 :%> R              ;

!!€gt-norm: ieŋŋils # Odd-syllable test
!!€ ieŋŋils:                 ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ieŋŋilsav:               ieŋŋils+A+Sg+Acc


LEXICON RÁDAS !!= @CODE@  Presently only used for "rádas". This word has special consonant gradation d>dd. Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: ráddasav, Attr: rádas. Consonant gradation.
                   :as%>    ATTR           ;
                   :as%>    N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :das%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :das%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:das%>it K-CONS         ;
                   :das%>   ODDCmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: rádas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rádas:               rádas+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ráddasav:            rádas+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ rádas:               rádas+A+Attr
!!€ ráda:                rádas+A+Attr # from LEXATTR
!!€ ráddasabbo:          rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON LUOBES !!= @CODE@  Err/Orth lexicon! Does the same as TJIEGOS only e>a instead of usuall e>á, must be some err/orth. Sg Acc: luohpasav, Attr: luobes. Consonant gradation. NO Attr, must be hardcoded

                   :es%>Q1 VUOHTA         ;
                   :es%>Q1 N-ODDCASE      ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
                   :as%>   OTH-ODDCASEadj ;
                   :as%>   ABBO/AMOS      ;
 +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:as%>it K-CONS       ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:es%>Q1 R             ;
                   :as%>   ODDCmp         ;



! double comparatives
