src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ajik+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ajig9 BASSTEL ;
aluk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:alug9 RIHTSOK ;
avtalåssåk+A+CmpNP/None:avta#låssåg9 BASSTEL ;
bahák+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahág9 RIHTSOK ;
basstel+A:basstel BASSTEL ;
biedok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:biedog9 BASSTEL ;
bielljis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bielljis MUTTÁK ;
bigok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bigog9 BASSTEL ;
bitjes+A+Err/Orth:bihtj LUOBES ; ! According to Kintel
bivval+A:bivval BASSTEL ;
buolleruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buolle#ruopps JALGGAT ;
buolljat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buollj JALGGAT ;
buorak+A:buorag9 BASSTEL ;
bájnnel+A:bájnnel BASSTEL ;
bárvak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bárvag9 MUTTÁK ;
diejddis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:diejddis BASSTEL ;
dimes+A+Err/Orth:dibm LUOBES ; !According to Tjihkkom and Kintel
doajmmel+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doajmmel BASSTEL ;
dulppat+A:dulpp JALGGAT ;
duolak+A:duolag9 BASSTEL ;
duolbbat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duolbb JALGGAT ;
duosstel+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duosstel BASSTEL ;
dámuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dámug9 BASSTEL ;
dågun+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dågun BASSTEL ;
dållåruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dållå#ruopps JALGGAT ;
eljuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eljug9 BASSTEL ;
gassjel+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gassjel BASSTEL ;
gasuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gasug9 RIHTSOK ;
giddis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giddis MUTTÁK ;
giehtatjårguk+A:giehta#tjårgug9 BASSTEL ;
gilggat+A:gilgg JALGGAT ;
gimes+A+Err/Orth:gibm LUOBES ; !According to Kintel
girjak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:girjag9 MUTTÁK ;
gisjuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gisjug9 BASSTEL ;
gullis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gulºlis MUTTÁK ;
guojttis+A:guojttis MUTTÁK ;
guoljok+A:guoljog9 BASSTEL ;
guovggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovgg JALGGAT ;
guovggisruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovggis#ruopps JALGGAT ;
guovggisrussjkat+A:guovggis#russjk JALGGAT ;
gåbduk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåbdug9 RIHTSOK ;
gåmosjævnnjat+A:gåmo#sjævnnjad9 RIHTSOK ;
gæhppat+A:gæhppad9 BASSTEL ;
gærgos+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gærggos RIHTSOK ;
gærmmat+A:gærmmad9 RIHTSOK ;
harmmat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:harmm JALGGAT ;
hillaruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hilla#ruopps JALGGAT ;
háhppel+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:háhppel BASSTEL ;
ieŋŋils+A:ieŋŋils IENNILS ;
jalggat+A:jalgg JALGGAT ;
jaskuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jaskug9 BASSTEL ;
jasskat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jassk JALGGAT ;
jålbbåt+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jålbb TJÅRGGÅT ; !
jårbbåt+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jårbb TJÅRGGÅT ; !
kristállatjuovggat+A:kristálla#tjuovgg JALGGAT ;
lerduk+A:lerdug9 BASSTEL ;
lines+A+Err/Orth:lidn LUOBES ; !According to Kintel 2020
livák+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:livág9 BASSTEL ;
luobes+A+Err/Orth:luohp LUOBES ; !According to Kintel
lásjmak+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lásjmag9 BASSTEL ;
maduk+A:madug9 RIHTSOK ;
madák+A:madág9 RIHTSOK ;
miedek+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miedeg9 BASSTEL ;
miellagiddis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miella#giddis MUTTÁK ;
miellagiddis+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:miela#giddis MUTTÁK ;
mujttis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mujttis MUTTÁK ;
muohtavielggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:muohta#vielgg JALGGAT ;
mutták+A+Err/Orth:muhttág9 MUTTÁK ;
mutták+A:muttág9 MUTTÁK ;
másjket+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:másjked9 RIHTSOK ; ! JALGGAT and TJÅRGGÅT
målkak+A:målkag9 MUTTÁK ;
mållåt+A:mållåd9 BASSTEL ;
månnevielggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:månne#vielgg JALGGAT ;
nammet+A:nammed9 BASSTEL ;
njunnjis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njunnjis MUTTÁK ;
njuobttsel+A:njuobttsel BASSTEL ;
njuolggat+A:njuolgg JALGGAT ;
njuvggat+A:njuvgg JALGGAT ;
njárbbat+A:njárbb JALGGAT ;
ratjik+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ratjig9 BASSTEL ;
ridák+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ridág9 MUTTÁK ;
rihtsok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rihtsog9 RIHTSOK ; ! !Not in BASSTEL becaous of rihtso attr, not rihtsogis
roahkkat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roahkk JALGGAT ;
ruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruopps JALGGAT ;
ruopsuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruopsug9 BASSTEL ;
russjkat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:russjk JALGGAT ;
ruvssoruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruvsso#ruopps JALGGAT ;
rádas+A:rád RÁDAS ;
sekkuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sekkug9 BASSTEL ;
sjimuk+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjimug9 BASSTEL ;
sjævnnjat+A:sjævnnjad9 RIHTSOK ; !
skielgok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skielgog9 BASSTEL ;
skárbak+A:skárbag9 RIHTSOK ;
skárlakruoppsat+A:skárlak#ruopps JALGGAT ;
smávuk+A:smávug9 RIHTSOK ;
snjiltjas+v1+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snjiltjas RIHTSOK ;
snjiltjas+v2+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjnjiltjas RIHTSOK ;
snjutjok+v1+A:snjutjog9 BASSTEL ;
snáves+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snávv LUOBES ; ! According to Kintel
snågok+A:snågog9 BASSTEL ;
stajggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stajggad9 RIHTSOK ;
stuovuk+A:stuovug9 BASSTEL ;
stájggat+A:stájggad9 RIHTSOK ;
suolggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suolgg JALGGAT ;
sáhppat+A:sáhpp JALGGAT ;
sáhppat+A:sáhpp JALGGAT ;
sárggat+A:sárgg JALGGAT ;
tjalmmis+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjalmmis MUTTÁK ;
tjalok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjalog9 BASSTEL ;
tjarggat+A:tjargg JALGGAT ;
tjierggat+v2+A:tjiergged9 BASSTEL ;
tjuojvvat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuojvv JALGGAT ;
tjuorbbat+A:tjuorbb JALGGAT ;
tjuorggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuorgg JALGGAT ;
tjuovggat+A:tjuovgg JALGGAT ;
tjuovggisruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovggis#ruopps JALGGAT ;
tjuovggissáhppat+A:tjuovggis#sáhpp JALGGAT ;
tjuovun+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovun BASSTEL ;
tjáhppat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhpp JALGGAT ;
tjáhppat+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjápp JALGGAT ;
tjáhppisruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#ruopps JALGGAT ;
tjårggåt+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjårgg TJÅRGGÅT ;
tsahkkat+A:tsahkk JALGGAT ;
tsahkkisruoppsat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsahkkis#ruopps JALGGAT ;
tsáhket+A:tsáhked9 BASSTEL ;
varraruoppsat+A:varra#ruopps JALGGAT ;
vedjat+v2+A:vædjad9 RIHTSOK ; !As Korhonen
viebmal+A:viebmal BASSTEL ;
vielggat+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vielgg JALGGAT ;
vuolok+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolog9 BASSTEL ;
vælok+A:vælog9 BASSTEL ;
árvas+A+Err/Orth:árvas MUTTÁK ;
